Alabama, session 2026rs, HB287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The Permanent Joint Legislative
Committee on the Law Enforcement Medal of Honor and
Meritorious Service Award is created for the purpose of
awarding the Law Enforcement Medal of Honor and the
Meritorious Service of Award.
Page 1

Meritorious Service of Award.
HB287 INTRODUCED
(b)(1) The membership of the committee shall consist of
all of the following:
a. Five members of the House of Representatives,
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, at
least one of whom shall be a member of the minority party.
b. Five members of the Senate, appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate, at least one of whom
shall be a member of the minority party.
(2) Members of the committee shall be appointed for a
four-year term concurrent with the members' elected terms of
office. Any vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the
original appointment for the remainder of the term.
(3) The appointing authorities shall coordinate their
appointments to ensure the committee membership is inclusive
and reflects the racial, gender, geographic, urban, rural, and
economic diversity of the state.
(c) The committee annually shall award the Legislative
Medal of Honor for Law Enforcement and the Legislative
Meritorious Service Award to members of law enforcement who
demonstrate extraordinary courage and exceptional service in
the line of duty.
(d)(1) The first meeting of the committee shall be held
at the call of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, at
which time the committee shall elect a chair and vice chair.
An election for chair and vice chair shall occur at the
committee's first meeting of each quadrennium.
(2) The committee may meet as necessary to conduct
business during the sessions of the Legislature, any recess,
Page 2

business during the sessions of the Legislature, any recess,
HB287 INTRODUCED
and in the interim period between sessions, provided that the
committee shall meet at least once every year.
(e) The Legislative Services Agency, the Clerk of the
House of Representatives, and the Secretary of the Senate
shall provide administrative and other assistance for the work
of the committee.
(f) Each member of the committee shall be entitled to
their legislative compensation, per diem, and travel expenses
for each day they attend a meeting of the committee pursuant
to Section 49 of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, no member shall receive
additional legislative compensation or per diem when the
Legislature is in session.
(g) Pursuant to Section 36-14-17.1, Code of Alabama
1975, the committee shall provide a notice of all meetings,
the name of each member serving on the committee, and a copy
of and any documents produced by the committee throughout its
duration to the Secretary of State.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 3